Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-347.04
Dismemberment abortion; penalty.

The intentional and knowing performance of an unlawful dismemberment abortion in violation of section 28-347 is a Class IV felony.

Laws 2020, LB814, § 7.